apertium-kir-uzb.kir.lexc
LEXICON GEN-POS-PX12SG
CASES-PX12SG ;
%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; !CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} DAGI ;
! %<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CASES ;
!%<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} V-ADJ ; ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this

!! LEXICON GEN-POS-SHORT-ACC
!! CASES-SHORT-ACC ;
!! %<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%} CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 

LEXICON POSSESSION
GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-ENDINGS  ! P_2
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS-PX12SG ; 
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON EXI

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>: ATTR ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON SUBST-COMMON

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
POSSESSION ;

!LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON
!
!!%<n%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ADJ ;  ! Any noun can be made into an adjective like this, though it's basically derivation
!! %<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;

LEXICON N-INFL-SG  ! nouns with no/irregular plural

!%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON N-INFL-PL  ! for irregular plurals
%<n%>%<pl%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON N-INFL      ! Nouns that have a LUU attributive form

!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} ATTR ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-INFL-KI   ! Nouns that have a KI attributive form

%<n%>: KI ;
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

! LEXICON N-INFL-NO-ATTR  ! Used for nouns that have irregular <attr> forms
! 
! %<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! 
! LEXICON N-INFL-JUST-KI  ! Used for nouns that have irregular KI forms
! 
! %<n%>: KI ;

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ; 
%<n%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;  ! for stuff like "биздин аба ырайыбыз" and even "анын аба ырайы",
                      ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-F

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}к ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR

%<np%>%<top%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON NAT
! Nationalities

ADJ ;             ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]"
N-INFL ;          ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
%>ч%{A%} ADV ;    ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish"
%>ч%{A%} N-INFL ; ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

! %<pst%>: # ;
# ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;
%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;        ! Dir/LR

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;            !# жақсырақ іс
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# жақсыны таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к SUBST ;  !# жақсырақты таптым
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к SUBST ;       ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к CLIT ;    !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к CLIT ;         ! Dir/LR

LEXICON CLIT

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON SUBST

SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
! %<n%>: POSSESSION ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! %<n%>: N-INFL ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns

LEXICON DAGI

!!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of CASES
!%<n%>: CASES ;
!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of N-INFL
!!%<n%>: N-INFL ;
!%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
!# ;

%<attr%>: # ;
!%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;  ! This is instead of the line below
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;  ! Use/Circ  !! FIXME: when we go recursie, uncomment


LEXICON V-ADJ

! ADJ-COMMON ; 
! %<pst%>:  # ; 
! # ;
ATTR ; 
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ATTR

# ;
V-CLIT ;
!ADJ-LEVELS ; ! In theory, there can be <pst> and <comp> readings, but depends what for

LEXICON ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ; 
%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ; 
%<adj%>%<advl%>: ADVL ;
%<adj%>: V-PERS-COP ;

! LEXICON ADJ-ORD
! 
! %<adj%>%<ord%>: # ;
! %<adj%>%<ord%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
! 
! LEXICON ADJ-KI
!
! %<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ATTR ;
%<subst%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-KI

%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;
ADV-ABL ; 

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-ABL ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL-REG

ADV ;
ADV-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL-REG

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADVL

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: ADVL ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: POSSESSION ; 
%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON PART 

%<part%>: # ;
%<part%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PART-PERS-COP

%<part%>: V-PERS-COP ;

! LEXICON PART-PERS-PAST 
! 
! %<part%>: V-PERS-PAST ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


LEXICON NumeralList

%0 NumeralLoop ;
1 NumeralLoop ;
2 NumeralLoop ;
3 NumeralLoop ;
4 NumeralLoop ;
5 NumeralLoop ;
6 NumeralLoop ;
7 NumeralLoop ;
8 NumeralLoop ;
9 NumeralLoop ;
%% NumeralLoop ;

LEXICON NumeralLoop
NumeralList ;
%. NumeralList  ;
%, NumeralList  ;
%. NUM ; ! Dir/RL
%, NUM ; ! Dir/RL
%%%<num%>:%% CASES ;
!Num ;
NUM ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>: CASES ;


LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;


LEXICON NUM-ONE

% жүз:% жүз NUM ; ! "one hundred"
% миң:% миң NUM ; ! "one thousand"
% миллион:% миллион NUM ; ! "one million"
% миллиард:% миллиард NUM ; ! "one billion"

NUM-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-ORDINAL

! FIXME: This should look more like in kaz.lexc probably
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;                      ! base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} ADVL ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;  ! yes, they can be plural

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! %<num%>%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й POSSESSION ;  ! WTF is this?
NUM-ORDINAL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бул PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунун # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муну # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мындан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мындай PRED ;  

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мындагы DAGI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:муну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:бу%>л%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON Numerals 
бир NUM-ONE ; ! "one"
эки NUM-ONE ; ! "two"
үч NUM-ONE ; ! "three"
төрт NUM-ONE ; ! "four"
беш NUM-ONE ; ! "five"
алты NUM-ONE ; ! "six"
жети NUM-ONE ; ! "seven"
сегиз NUM-ONE ; ! "eight"
тогуз NUM-ONE ; ! "nine"
он:он NUM ; ! "ten"
жыйырма:жыйырма NUM ; ! "twenty"
отуз:отуз NUM ; ! "thirty"
кырк:кырк NUM ; ! "forty"
элүү:элүү NUM ; ! "fifty"
алтымыш:алтымыш NUM ; ! "sixty"
жетимиш:жетимиш NUM ; ! "seventy"
сексен:сексен NUM ; ! "eighty"
токсон:токсон NUM ; ! "ninety"
жүз:жүз NUM ; ! "one hundred"
миң:миң NUM ; ! "one thousand"
миллион:миллион NUM ; ! "one million"
миллиард:миллиард NUM ; ! "one billion"
ноль:ноль NUM ;
он% эки:он% эки NUM ;
он% бир:он% бир NUM ;
триллион:триллион NUM ;
онтогуз:онтогуз NUM ;
жыйырма% беш:жыйырма% беш NUM ;
он% сегиз:он% сегиз NUM ;
он% беш:он% беш NUM ;
он% алты:он% алты NUM ;
бир% жарым:бир% жарым NUM ;
I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
